Indiana, session 2026, HB1030.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-8-10-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.170-2013,
SECTION 66, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. The application described in section 2 of this
chapter must state that the applicant:
(1) holds a cosmetologist license issued under IC 25-8-9 or an
esthetician license issued under IC 25-8-12.5;
(2) (1) has successfully completed the a combined total of six
hundred (600) hours of education and experience requirements
required under the rules adopted by the board in the instruction
of for electrology training in a beauty culture school;
(3) (2) has received a satisfactory grade (as defined by
IC 25-8-4-9) on an examination for electrologist license
prescribed by the board;
(4) (3) has not committed an act for which the applicant could be
disciplined under IC 25-8-14; and
(5) (4) has paid the fee set forth in IC 25-8-13-8 for the issuance
of a license under this chapter.
2026 IN 1030—LS 6151/DI 148


SECTION 2. IC 25-8-10-3.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.170-2013,
SECTION 67, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3.1. If a person does not receive a satisfactory
grade on the examination described in section 3(3) 3(2) of this chapter,
the person may repeat the examination without completing any
additional study in electrology.
SECTION 3. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) Not later than June
30, 2027, the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners
shall amend:
(1) 820 IAC 3-1-13 to allow electrology services to be
performed in the same room that is used for esthetics services,
although not at the same time;
(2) 820 IAC 3-2-10 to allow esthetics services to be performed
in the same room that is used for electrology services,
although not at the same time; and
(3) 820 IAC 4-4-7 to require a combined total of six hundred
(600) hours of education and experience for electrology
training.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
2026 IN 1030—LS 6151/DI 148